02_Morphology/morphology.lexc
LEXICON Root
Nouns;

LEXICON Nouns
ES;
S;
I;
VES;
Other;

LEXICON ES
bus%<n%>%<pl%> : buses #;
box%<n%>%<pl%> : boxes #;
church%<n%>%<pl%> : churches #;
crash%<n%>%<pl%> : crashes #;
lens%<n%>%<pl%> : lenses #;
peach%<n%>%<pl%> : peaches #;

LEXICON S
dog%<n%>%<pl%> : dogs #;
car%<n%>%<pl%> : cars #;
window%<n%>%<pl%> : windows #;
song%<n%>%<pl%> : songs #;
jacket%<n%>%<pl%> : jackets #;
chip%<n%>%<pl%> : chips #;

LEXICON I
fungus%<n%>%<pl%> : fungi #;
syllabus%<n%>%<pl%> : syllabi #;
terminus%<n%>%<pl%> : termini #;

LEXICON VES
knife%<n%>%<pl%> : knives #;
calf%<n%>%<pl%> : calves #;
shelf%<n%>%<pl%> : shelves #;

LEXICON Other
goose%<n%>%<pl%> : geese #;
foot%<n%>%<pl%> : feet #;
